California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
-------------------------------------------

4139.

(a) Except as otherwise authorized by law, or when authorized by the director of the state hospital, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a person who possesses with the intent to deliver, or delivers, to a patient in a state hospital listed in Section 4100 any item listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, that has been prohibited for possession by a patient either by statute or by regulation is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each item.

(1) A cellular telephone or other wireless communication device, or any component thereof, including, but not limited to, a subscriber identity card (SIM card) or memory
 storage device.

(2) Tobacco products, if the state hospital has a ban on tobacco products.

(3) Money, in excess of the limitations and restrictions adopted by the state hospital.

(b) If a person visiting a patient in a state hospital listed in Section 4100, upon being searched or subjected to a metal detector, is found to be in possession of an item prohibited for patient possession pursuant to subdivision (a), the item shall be subject to confiscation but shall be returned on the same day the person visits the patient, unless the item is held as evidence in a case where the person is cited for a violation of subdivision (a). If, upon investigation, it is determined that no prosecution will take place, the item shall be returned to the owner at the owner’s expense. Notice of this provision shall be posted in all
 areas where visitors are searched prior to visitation with a patient and outside the facility in a location easily visible to visitors so that they can leave prohibited items in their cars before entering the visitor area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4141.

(a) (1) Each state hospital shall update its injury and illness prevention plan at least once a year to include necessary safeguards to prevent workplace safety hazards in connection with workplace violence associated with patient assaults on employees.

(2) Updated injury and illness prevention plans shall address, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Control of physical access throughout the hospital and grounds.

(B) Alarm systems.

(C) Presence of security personnel.

(D) Training.

(E) Buddy systems.

(F) Communication.

(G) Emergency responses.

(3) (A) The department shall submit the updated injury and illness prevention plans to the Legislature every two years.

(B) (i) The requirement for submitting the updated injury and illness prevention plans imposed pursuant to subparagraph (A) is inoperative four years after the date the first report is due, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(ii) Updated injury and illness prevention plans submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section
 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) Each state hospital shall establish an injury and illness prevention committee comprised of hospital management and employees designated by the hospital’s director in consultation with the employee bargaining units. The committee shall be responsible for providing recommendations to the hospital director for updates to the injury and illness prevention plan. The committee shall meet at least four times per year.

(c) Each state hospital shall develop an incident reporting procedure that can be used, at a minimum, to develop reports of patient assaults on employees and assist the hospital in identifying risks of patient assaults on employees. Data obtained from the incident reporting procedures shall be accessible to staff. The incident reporting procedure shall be designed to provide hospital management with immediate notification of reported
 incidents. The hospital shall provide for timely and efficient responses and investigations to incident reports made under the incident reporting procedure. Incident reports shall also be forwarded to the injury and illness prevention committee established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 203.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4142.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever a patient is committed to the State Department of State Hospitals, a director of a state hospital or a clinician, as defined in subdivision (f), shall obtain the state summary criminal history information for the patient. The information shall be used to assess the violence risk of a patient, to assess the appropriate placement of a patient, to treat a patient, to prepare periodic reports as required by statute, or to determine the patient’s progress or fitness for release. The state summary criminal history information shall be placed in the patient’s confidential file for the duration of his or her commitment.

(b) The information may be obtained through use of the California Law
 Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS). Law enforcement personnel shall cooperate with requests for state summary criminal history information authorized pursuant to this section and shall provide the information to the requesting entity in a timely manner.

(c) A law enforcement officer or person authorized by this section to receive the information who obtains the information in the record and knowingly provides the information to a person not authorized by law to receive the information is guilty of a misdemeanor as specified in Section 11142 of the Penal Code.

(d) Information obtained pursuant to this section shall not be used for any purposes other than those described in subdivision (a).

(e) For purposes of this section, the State Department of State Hospitals law enforcement personnel, pursuant to
 Section 830.38 of the Penal Code, may act as the law enforcement personnel described in subdivision (b).

(f) For purposes of this section, “clinician” means a state licensed mental health professional working within the State Department of State Hospitals who has received, and is current in, CLETS training that is appropriate for a person who has ongoing access to information from the CLETS and is not a CLETS operator, following the policies on training, compliance, and inspection required by the Department of Justice.

(g) State summary criminal history information secured pursuant to this section shall remain confidential and access shall be limited to the director of the state hospital and the clinician. Within 30 days of discharge from the state hospital, the state summary criminal history information shall be removed from the patient’s file and
 destroyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 572.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4143.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2015, and subject to available funding, the State Department of State Hospitals may establish and maintain pilot enhanced treatment programs (ETPs), as defined in Section 1265.9 of the Health and Safety Code, and evaluate the effectiveness of intensive, evidence-based clinical therapy and treatment of patients described in Section 4144.

(b) At least 60 days prior to activating an ETP, the State Department of State Hospitals shall submit written draft policies and procedures that will guide the operation of the ETP, including, but not limited to,
 admittance criteria, staffing levels, services to be provided to patients, a transition planning process, and training requirements, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 48.   (SB 85)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4144.

(a) A state hospital psychiatrist or psychologist may refer a patient to a pilot enhanced treatment program (ETP), as defined in Section 1265.9 of the Health and Safety Code, for temporary placement and risk assessment upon determining that the patient may be at high risk of most dangerous behavior and when safe treatment is not possible in a standard treatment environment. The referral may occur after admission to the State Department of State Hospitals, and after sufficient and documented evaluation of violence risk of the patient, with notice to the patients’ rights advocate at the time of the referral. A patient shall not be placed into an ETP as a means of punishment, coercion, convenience, or retaliation.

(b) Within
 three business days of placement in an ETP, a dedicated forensic evaluator, who is not on the patient’s treatment team, shall complete an initial evaluation of the patient that shall include an interview of the patient’s treatment team, an analysis of diagnosis, past violence, current level of risk, and the need for enhanced treatment.

(c) (1) Within seven business days of placement in an ETP and with 72-hour notice to the patient and patients’ rights advocate, the forensic needs assessment panel (FNAP) shall conduct a placement evaluation meeting with the referring psychiatrist or psychologist, the patient and patients’ rights advocate, and the dedicated forensic evaluator who performed the initial evaluation. A determination shall be made as to whether the patient clinically requires ETP treatment.

(2) (A) The threshold standard for
 treatment in an ETP is met if a psychiatrist or psychologist, utilizing standard forensic methodologies for clinically assessing violence risk, determines that a patient meets the definition of a patient at high risk of most dangerous behavior and ETP treatment meets the identified needs of the patient and safe treatment is not possible in a standard treatment environment.

(B) Factors used to determine a patient’s high risk of most dangerous behavior may include, but are not limited to, an analysis of past violence, delineation of static and dynamic violence risk factors, and utilization of valid and reliable violence risk assessment testing.

(3) If a patient has shown improvement during his or her placement in an ETP, the FNAP may delay its certification decision for another seven business days. The FNAP’s determination of whether the patient will benefit from continued or longer
 term ETP placement and treatment shall be based on the threshold standard for treatment in an ETP specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(d) (1) The FNAP shall review all material presented at the FNAP placement evaluation meeting conducted under subdivision (c), and the FNAP shall either certify the patient for 90 days of treatment in an ETP or direct that the patient be returned to a standard treatment environment in the hospital.

(2) After the FNAP makes a decision to provide ETP treatment and if ETP treatment will be provided at a facility other than the current hospital, the transfer may take place as soon as transportation may reasonably be arranged, but no later than 30 days after the decision is made.

(3) The FNAP determination shall be in writing and provided to the patient and
 patients’ rights advocate as soon as possible, but no later than three business days after the decision is made.

(e) (1) Upon admission to an ETP, a forensic needs assessment team (FNAT) psychologist who is not on the patient’s multidisciplinary treatment team shall perform an in-depth violence risk assessment and make an individual treatment plan for the patient based on the assessment. The individual treatment plan shall:

(A) Be in writing and developed in collaboration with the patient, when possible. The initial treatment plan shall be developed as soon as possible, but no later than 72 hours following the patient’s admission. The comprehensive treatment plan shall be developed following a complete violence risk assessment.

(B) Be based on a comprehensive assessment of the patient’s
 physical, mental, emotional, and social needs, and focused on mitigation of violence risk factors.

(C) Be reviewed and updated no less than every 10 days.

(2) The individual treatment plan shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) A statement of the patient’s physical and mental condition, including all mental health and medical diagnoses.

(B) Prescribed medication, dosage, and frequency of administration.

(C) Specific goals of treatment with intervention and actions that identify steps toward reduction of violence risk and observable, measurable objectives.

(D) Identification of methods to be utilized,
 the frequency for conducting each treatment method, and the person, or persons, or discipline, or disciplines, responsible for each treatment method.

(E) Documentation of the success or failure in achieving stated objectives.

(F) Evaluation of the factors contributing to the patient’s progress or lack of progress toward reduction of violence risk and a statement of the multidisciplinary treatment decision for followup action.

(G) An activity plan.

(H) A plan for other services needed by the patient, such as care for medical and physical ailments, which are not provided by the multidisciplinary treatment team.

(I) Discharge criteria and goals for an aftercare plan in a standard treatment
 environment and a plan for post-ETP discharge follow up.

(3) An ETP patient shall receive treatment from a multidisciplinary team consisting of a psychologist, a psychiatrist, a nurse, a psychiatric technician, a clinical social worker, a rehabilitation therapist, and any other necessary staff who shall meet as often as necessary, but no less than once a week, to assess the patient’s response to treatment.

(4) The staff shall observe and note any changes in the patient’s condition and the treatment plan shall be modified in response to the observed changes.

(5) Social work services shall be organized, directed, and supervised by a licensed clinical social worker.

(6) (A) Mental health treatment programs shall provide and conduct
 organized therapeutic social, recreational, and vocational activities in accordance with the interests, abilities, and needs of the patients, including the opportunity for exercise.

(B) Mental health rehabilitation therapy services shall be designed by and provided under the direction of a licensed mental health professional, a recreational therapist, or an occupational therapist.

(7) An aftercare plan for a standard treatment environment shall be developed.

(A) A written aftercare plan shall describe those services that should be provided to a patient following discharge, transfer, or release from an ETP for the purpose of enabling the patient to maintain stabilization or achieve an optimum level of functioning.

(B) Prior to or at the time of
 discharge, transfer, or release from an ETP, each patient shall be evaluated concerning the patient’s need for aftercare services. This evaluation shall consider the patient’s potential housing, probable need for continued treatment and social services, and need for continued medical and mental health care.

(C) Aftercare plans shall include, but shall not be limited to, arrangements for medication administration and follow-up care.

(D) A member of the multidisciplinary treatment team designated by the clinical director shall be responsible for ensuring that the aftercare plan has been completed and documented in the patient’s health record.

(E) The patient shall receive a copy of the aftercare plan when referred to a standard treatment environment.

(f) Prior to the expiration of 90 days from the date of placement in an ETP and with 72-hour notice provided to the patient and the patients’ rights advocate, the FNAP shall convene a treatment placement meeting with a psychologist from the treatment team, a patients’ rights advocate, the patient, and the FNAT psychologist who performed the in-depth violence risk assessment. The FNAP shall determine whether the patient may return to a standard treatment environment or whether the patient clinically requires continued treatment in an ETP. If the FNAP determines that the patient clinically requires continued ETP placement, the patient shall be certified for further ETP placement for one year. The FNAP determination shall be in writing and provided to the patient and the patients’ rights advocate within 24 hours of the meeting. If the FNAP determines that the patient is ready to be transferred to a standard treatment environment, the FNAP shall identify appropriate placement within a standard
 treatment environment in a state hospital, and transfer the patient within 30 days of the determination.

(g) If a patient has been certified for ETP treatment for one year pursuant to subdivision (f), the FNAP shall review the patient’s treatment summary at least every 90 days to determine if the patient no longer clinically requires treatment in the ETP. This FNAP determination shall be in writing and provided to the patient and the patients’ rights advocate within three business days of the meeting. If the FNAP determines that the patient no longer clinically requires treatment in the ETP, the FNAP shall identify appropriate placement, and transfer the patient within 30 days of the determination.

(h) Prior to the expiration of the one-year certification of ETP placement under subdivision (f), and with 72-hour notice provided to the patient and the patients’ rights advocate, the
 FNAP shall convene a treatment placement meeting with the treatment team, the patients’ rights advocate, the patient, and the FNAT psychologist who performed the in-depth violence risk assessment. The FNAP shall determine whether the patient clinically requires continued ETP treatment. The FNAP determination shall be in writing and provided to the patient and the patients’ rights advocate within 24 hours of the meeting.

(i) If after the treatment placement meeting described in subdivision (h), and after discussion with the patient, the patients’ rights advocate, patient’s ETP team members, and review of documents and records, the FNAP determines that the patient clinically requires continued ETP placement, the patient’s case shall be referred outside of the State Department of State Hospitals to a forensic psychiatrist or psychologist for an independent medical review for the purpose of assessing the patient’s overall treatment plan and the
 need for ongoing ETP treatment. Notice of the referral shall be provided to the patient and the patients’ rights advocate within 24 hours of the FNAP meeting as part of the FNAP determination. The notice shall include instructions for the patient to submit information to the forensic psychiatrist or psychologist conducting the independent medical review.

(1) The forensic psychiatrist or psychologist conducting the independent medical review shall be provided with the patient’s medical and psychiatric documents and records, along with any additional information submitted by the patient, within five business days from the date of the FNAP’s determination that the patient requires continued ETP placement.

(2) After reviewing the patient’s medical and psychiatric documents and records, along with any additional information submitted by the patient, but no later than 14 days after the
 receipt of the patient’s medical and psychiatric documents and records, the forensic psychiatrist or psychologist conducting the independent medical review shall provide the State Department of State Hospitals, the patient, and the patients’ rights advocate with a written notice of the date and time for a hearing. At least one FNAP member is required to attend the hearing. The notice shall be provided at least 72 hours in advance of the hearing, shall include a statement that at least one FNAP member is required to attend the hearing, and advise the patient of his or her right to a hearing or to waive his or her right to a hearing. The notice shall also include a statement that the patient may have assistance of a patients’ rights advocate or staff member at the hearing. Seventy-two-hour notice shall also be provided to any individuals whose presence is requested by the forensic psychiatrist or psychologist conducting the independent medical review in order to help assess the patient’s overall treatment plan
 and the need for ongoing ETP treatment.

(3) If the patient waives his or her right to a hearing, the forensic psychiatrist or psychologist conducting the independent medical review shall make recommendations to the FNAP on whether or not the patient should be certified for ongoing ETP treatment.

(4) If the patient does not waive the right to a hearing, both of the following shall be provided:

(A) If the patient elects to have the assistance of a patients’ rights advocate or a staff person, the requested person shall provide assistance relating to the hearing, whether or not the patient is present at the hearing, unless the forensic psychiatrist or psychologist conducting the hearing finds good cause why the requested person should not participate. Good cause includes a reasonable concern for the safety of a staff
 member requested to be present at the hearing.

(B) An opportunity for the patient to present information, statements, or arguments, either orally or in writing, to show either that the information relied on for the FNAP’s determination for ongoing treatment is erroneous, or any other relevant information.

(5) The conclusion reached by the forensic psychiatrist or psychologist who conducts the independent medical review shall be in writing and provided to the State Department of State Hospitals, the patient, and the patients’ rights advocate within three business days of the conclusion of the hearing.

(6) If the forensic psychiatrist or psychologist who conducts the independent medical review concludes that the patient requires ongoing ETP treatment, the patient shall be certified for further treatment for an
 additional year.

(7) If the forensic psychiatrist or psychologist who conducts the independent medical review determines that the patient no longer requires ongoing ETP treatment, the FNAP shall identify appropriate placement and transfer the patient within 30 days of determination.

(j) At any point during the ETP placement, if a patient’s treatment team determines that the patient no longer clinically requires ETP treatment, a recommendation to transfer the patient out of the ETP shall be made to the FNAT or FNAP.

(k) The process described in this section may continue until the patient no longer clinically requires ETP treatment or until the patient is discharged from the State Department of State Hospitals.

(l) As used in this section, the
 following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Enhanced treatment program” or “ETP” means a supplemental treatment unit as defined in Section 1265.9 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Forensic needs assessment panel” or “FNAP” means a panel that consists of a psychiatrist, a psychologist, and the medical director of the hospital or facility, none of whom are involved in the patient’s treatment or diagnosis at the time of the hearing or placement meetings.

(3) “Forensic needs assessment team” or “FNAT” means a panel of psychologists with expertise in forensic assessment or violence risk assessment, each of whom are assigned an ETP case or group of cases.

(4) “In-depth violence risk assessment” means the utilization of standard forensic methodologies
 for clinically assessing the risk of a patient posing a substantial risk of inpatient aggression.

(5) “Patients’ rights advocate” means the advocate contracted under Sections 5370.2 and 5510.

(6) “Patient at high risk of most dangerous behavior” means the individual has a history of physical violence and currently poses a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others in an inpatient setting, as determined by an evidence-based, in-depth violence risk assessment conducted by the State Department of State Hospitals.

(m) The State Department of State Hospitals may adopt emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement the treatment components of this
 section. The adoption of an emergency regulation under this paragraph is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the State Department of State Hospitals is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 573.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4145.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals shall monitor the pilot enhanced treatment programs (ETP), evaluate outcomes, and report on its findings and recommendations. This report shall be provided to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature annually, beginning on January 10 of the first year after which the first ETP is opened and services have commenced, and shall be in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The evaluation shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Comparative summary information regarding the characteristics of the patients served.

(2) Compliance with staffing requirements.

(3) Staff classification to patient ratio.

(4) Average monthly occupancy.

(5) Average length of stay.

(6) The number of residents whose length of stay exceeds 90 days.

(7) The number of patients with multiple stays.

(8) The number of patients whose discharge was delayed due to lack of available beds in a standard treatment environment.

(9) Restraint and seclusion use, including the number of incidents and duration, consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1180.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(10) Serious injuries to staff and residents.

(11) Serious injuries to staff and residents related to the use of seclusion and restraints as defined under Section 1180 of the Health and Safety Code.

(12) Staff turnover.

(13) The number of patients’ rights complaints, including the subject of the complaint and its resolution.

(14) Type and number of training provided for ETP staff.

(15) Staffing levels for ETPs.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals’ reporting requirements under Section 4023 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall apply to the ETPs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 718, Sec. 6.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4146.

(a) This section applies in cases in which a patient has been committed to the department as a mentally disordered offender, including a person found not guilty by reason of insanity, or a person found incompetent to stand trial or be adjudged to punishment.

(b) (1) A physician employed by the department who determines
 that a patient meets the criteria set forth in subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (5) shall notify the medical director and the patient advocate of the prognosis. If the medical director concurs with the diagnosis, he or she shall immediately notify the Director of State Hospitals. Within 72 hours of receiving notification, the medical director or the medical director’s designee shall notify the patient of the discharge procedures under this section and obtain the patient’s consent for discharge. The medical director or the medical
 director’s designee shall arrange for the patient to designate a family member or other outside agent to be notified as to the patient’s medical condition, prognosis, and release procedures under this section. If the patient is unable to designate a family member or other outside agent, the medical director or the medical director’s designee shall contact any emergency contact listed, or the patient advocate if no contact is listed. 

(2) The medical director or the medical director’s designee shall provide the patient and his or her family member, agent, emergency contact, or patient advocate with updated information throughout the release process with regard to the patient’s medical condition and the status of the patient’s release proceedings, including the discharge plan. A patient shall not be released unless the discharge plan
 verifies placement for the patient upon release.

(3) The patient or his or her family member or designee may contact the medical director or the executive director at the state hospital where the patient is located or the Director of State Hospitals to request consideration for a recommendation from the
 medical director or the medical director’s designee to the court that the patient’s commitment be suspended for compassionate release and the patient released from the department facility.

(4) Upon receipt of a notification or request pursuant to paragraph (1) or (3), respectively, the Director of State Hospitals
 may recommend to the court that the patient’s commitment be suspended for compassionate release and the patient released from the department facility.

(5) The court has the discretion to suspend the commitment for compassionate release and release the patient if
 the court finds that the facts described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) or subparagraphs (B) and (C) exist:

(A) The patient is terminally ill with an incurable condition caused by an illness or disease that would likely produce death within six months, as determined by a physician employed by the department.

(B) The conditions under which the patient would be released or receive treatment do not pose a threat to public safety.

(C) The patient is permanently medically incapacitated with a medical condition that renders him or her permanently unable to perform activities of basic daily living and results in the patient requiring 24-hour total care, including, but not limited to, coma, persistent vegetative state, brain
 death, ventilator-dependency, or loss of control of muscular or neurological function, the incapacitation did not exist at the time of the original commitment, and the medical director responsible for the patient’s care and the Director of State Hospitals both certify that the patient is incapable of receiving mental health treatment.

(c) Within 10 days of receipt of a recommendation for release by the director, the court shall hold a noticed hearing to consider whether the patient’s commitment should be suspended and the patient released.

(d) A recommendation for
 compassionate release submitted to the court shall include at least one medical evaluation, a discharge plan, a postrelease plan for the relocation and treatment of the patient, and the physician’s and medical director’s determination that the patient meets the criteria set forth in subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b). The court shall order the medical director to send copies of all medical records reviewed in developing the recommendation to all of the following parties:

(1) The district attorney of the county from which the patient was committed.

(2) If the patient is a mentally disordered offender on parole, the district attorney of the county from which the patient was committed to the state prison.

(3) The public defender of the county from which the patient was committed, or the patient’s private attorney, if one is available.

(4) If the patient is a mentally disordered offender on parole, the public defender of the county from which the patient was committed to the state prison, if one is available, or the patient’s private attorney, if applicable.

(5) If the patient is a mentally disordered offender on parole, the Board of Parole Hearings.

(6) If the patient is on mandatory supervision or postrelease community supervision and has been found incompetent to be adjudged to punishment, the county entity designated to supervise him or her.

(e) (1) The matter shall be heard before the same judge that originally committed the patient, if possible.

(2) If the patient is a mentally disordered offender on parole and was committed for treatment by the Board of Parole Hearings, the matter shall be heard by the court that committed the patient to the state prison for the underlying conviction, if possible.

(f) If the court approves the recommendation for compassionate release, the patient’s commitment shall be
 suspended and the patient shall be released by the department within 72 hours of receipt of the court’s order, unless a longer time period is requested by the director and approved by the court.

(g) The executive director of the state hospital or his or her designee shall ensure that upon release, the patient has each of the following in his or her possession, or the possession of the patient’s representative:

(1) A discharge plan.

(2) A discharge medical summary.

(3) Medical records.

(4) Identification.

(5) All necessary medications.

(6) Any property belonging to the patient.

(h) After discharge, any additional records shall be sent to the patient’s forwarding address.

(i) The Director of State Hospitals may adopt regulations to implement this section. The adoption of regulations for the implementation of this section by the department is exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(j) For the purposes of this section,
 a patient whose commitment has been suspended for compassionate release shall not be considered to be under the custody of, or the responsibility of, the State Department of State Hospitals.

(k) If a patient’s commitment order is suspended pursuant to this section, it may be reinstated by the court pursuant to a finding by the State Department of State Hospitals that the patient’s condition has changed such that he or she poses a threat to public safety, or no longer meets the criteria for compassionate release described in subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(l) The State Department of State Hospitals, in consultation with
 relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, local law enforcement and correctional officials, shall promulgate regulations in accordance with subdivision (i) to establish a process for petitioning the court for reinstatement of a suspended commitment order, pursuant to subdivision (k).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   (SB 955)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4147.

(a) To confront the crisis of individuals found incompetent to stand trial (IST) and in recognition of the importance of these defendants who are committed to the State Department of State Hospitals to begin receiving competency treatment as soon as practicable, the California Health and Human Services Agency along with the State Department of State Hospitals shall convene an Incompetent to Stand Trial Solutions Workgroup to identify short, medium, and long-term solutions to advance alternatives to placement at the State Department of State Hospitals.

(b) Workgroup members shall be appointed by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services and the workgroup shall be chaired by the Director of the State Department of State Hospitals.
 Members of the workgroup shall serve without compensation. Members may include, but are not limited to, representatives from the following entities and interested parties:

(1) California Health and Human Services Agency.

(2) State Department of Health Care Services.

(3) State Department of Developmental Services.

(4) Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(5) Department of Finance.

(6) Other state agencies, as needed.

(7) Judicial Council.

(8) Other partners, including local government and
 justice system representatives of entities involved in the commitment of IST defendants to the State Department of State Hospitals and representatives of patients and their family members, as needed.

(c) The workgroup shall submit recommendations to the California Health and Human Services Agency and the Department of Finance no later than November 30, 2021, outlining short-term solutions that can be accomplished by April 1, 2022, medium-term solutions that can be accomplished by January 10, 2023, and long-term solutions that can be accomplished by January 10, 2024, and January 10, 2025, to support the State Department of State Hospitals in serving individuals with the most intensive behavioral health treatment needs and providing timely access to treatment for individuals found IST on felony charges.

(d) The workgroup may meet as often as bi-weekly until the workgroup is
 disbanded by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services.

(e) The workgroup may consider, but is not limited to, recommendations that accomplish any of the following:

(1) Reduce the total number of felony defendants determined to be IST.

(2) Reduce the lengths of stay for felony IST patients.

(3) Support felony IST defendants to receive early access to treatment before transfer to a restoration of competency treatment program to achieve stabilization and restoration of competency sooner.

(4) Support increased access to felony IST diversion options.

(5) Expand treatment options for felony IST individuals, such as
 community-based restoration programs, jail-based competency treatment programs, and state hospital beds.

(6) Create new options for treatment of felony IST defendants including community based, locked and unlocked facilities.

(7) Establish partnerships to facilitate admissions and discharges to reduce recidivism and ensure that the most acute, high-risk, and at need patients receive access to State Department of State Hospitals beds, while patients with lower risk or acuity are treated in appropriate community settings.

(f) (1)   Until December 31, 2024, if the Secretary of California Health and Human Services determines that either of the conditions stated in subparagraphs (A) or all of the conditions stated in subparagraph (B) have occurred, the State Department of State Hospitals may take the actions described in
 paragraph (2), if authorized by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services and the Department of Finance, and after Department of Finance has provided no less than a 30-day notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the State Department of State Hospitals has provided notification to the county public guardian and county behavioral agencies.

(A) The recommendations required to be completed by subdivision (c) cannot be completed due to reasons outside of the control of the California Health and Human Services Agency or the State Department of State Hospitals.

(B)(i) Insufficient progress has been made in implementing the recommendations in a timely manner to provide timely access to competency treatment for IST defendants committed to the State Department of State Hospitals.

(ii) IST
 commitments to the State Department of State Hospitals continues to exceed the capacity available, in facilities the department has jurisdiction over pursuant to Section 4100, to provide restoration of competency treatment.

(iii) The State Department of State Hospitals continues to maintain an IST admission waitlist that exceeds the capacity of the facilities within its jurisdiction pursuant to Section 4100 to admit IST commitments.

(iv) As a result of the conditions described in clauses (i) through (iii), inclusive, IST defendants committed to the State Department of State Hospitals are not able to receive timely access to restoration of competency treatment and no reasonable state solutions are available, including timely solutions to increase capacity within the facilities within its jurisdiction pursuant to Section 4100 that may admit IST commitments.
